Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.205

Records—Teachers' retirement system annual report.

The department shall keep a record of all its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection. It shall publish annually a report showing the fiscal transactions of the Washington state teachers' retirement system for the preceding school year; the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the system, and the last balance sheet showing the financial condition of the system by means of an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

[ 1991 c 35 s 33; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 4; 1947 c 80 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-31. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 2, part; 1937 c 221 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-3, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.